Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.030

Bonds not debt of state.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall be issued in the name of the commission. The bonds shall not be obligations of the state of Washington and shall be obligations only of the commission payable from the special fund or funds created by the commission for their payment. Such funds shall not be or constitute public moneys or funds of the state of Washington but at all times shall be kept segregated and set apart from other funds.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall contain a recital on their face to the effect that payment of the principal of, interest on, and prepayment premium, if any, on the bonds, shall be a valid claim only as against the special fund or funds relating thereto, that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of the state, other than the commission as set forth in this chapter, is pledged to the payment of the principal of, interest on, and prepayment premium, if any, on the bonds.

Contracts entered into by the commission shall be entered into in the name of the commission and not in the name of the state of Washington. The obligations of the commission under the contracts shall be obligations only of the commission and are not in any way obligations of the state of Washington.

[ 1983 c 161 s 3.]